Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.160

Personal representative as successor to notice agent—Notice not affected—Presumptions—Duties.

If a notice agent had commenced nonprobate notice to creditors under chapter 11.42 RCW, the appointment of the personal representative does not affect the filing and publication of notice to creditors and does not affect actual notice to creditors given by the notice agent. The personal representative is presumed to have adopted or ratified all acts of the notice agent unless, within thirty days of appointment, the personal representative provides notice of rejection or nullification to the affected claimant or claimants by personal service or certified mail addressed to the claimant or claimant's agent, if applicable, at the address stated on the claim. The personal representative shall also provide notice under RCW 11.42.150.

[ 1997 c 252 s 23.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.